California statutes. Penal Code
(a) A temporary emergency gun violence restraining order may be issued on an ex parte basis only if a law enforcement officer asserts, and a judicial officer finds, that there is reasonable cause to believe both of the following:

(1) The subject of the petition poses an immediate and present danger of causing personal injury to himself, herself, or another by having in his or her custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm or ammunition.

(2) A temporary emergency gun violence restraining order is necessary to prevent personal injury to the subject of the petition or another because less restrictive alternatives either have been tried and found to be ineffective, or have
 been determined to be inadequate or inappropriate for the circumstances of the subject of the petition.

(b) A temporary emergency gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to this chapter shall prohibit the subject of the petition from having in his or her custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm or ammunition, and shall expire 21 days from the date the order is issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 898, Sec. 7.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18130.

A temporary emergency gun violence restraining order is valid only if it is issued by a judicial officer after making the findings required by Section 18125 and pursuant to a specific request by a law enforcement officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 18122.)
-------------------------------------------

18135.

(a) A temporary emergency gun violence restraining order issued under this chapter shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement of the grounds supporting the issuance of the order.

(2) The date and time the order expires.

(3) The address of the superior court for the county in which the restrained party resides.

(4) The following statement:
“To the restrained person: This order will last until the date and time noted above. You are required to surrender all firearms, ammunition, and
 magazines that you own or possess in accordance with Section 18120 of the Penal Code and you may not have in your custody or control, own, purchase, possess, or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive any firearm, ammunition, or magazine while this order is in effect. However, a more permanent gun violence restraining order may be obtained from the court. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with the order. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may assist you in any matter connected with the order.”
(b) When serving a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order, a law enforcement officer shall verbally ask the restrained person if he or she has any firearm, ammunition, or magazine in his or her possession or under his or her custody or control.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 898, Sec. 8.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18140.

A law enforcement officer who requests a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order shall do all of the following:

(a) If the request is made orally, sign a declaration under penalty of perjury reciting the oral statements provided to the judicial officer and memorialize the order of the court on the form approved by the Judicial Council.

(b) Serve the order on the restrained person, if the restrained person can reasonably be located.

(c) File a copy of the order with the court as soon as practicable, but not later than three court days, after issuance.

(d) Have the order entered into the
 computer database system for protective and restraining orders maintained by the Department of Justice.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 286, Sec. 1.   (AB 2617)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

18145.

(a) (1) A judicial officer may issue a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order orally based on the statements of a law enforcement officer made in accordance with subdivision (a) of Section 18140.

(2) If time and circumstances
 permit, a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order may be obtained in writing and based on a declaration signed under penalty of perjury.

(b) The presiding judge of the superior court of each county shall designate at least one judge, commissioner, or referee who shall be reasonably available to issue temporary emergency gun violence restraining orders when the court is not in session.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 873, Sec. 2.   (AB 2526)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

18148.

Within 21 days after the date on the order, the court that issued the order or another court in the same jurisdiction, shall hold a hearing pursuant to Section 18175 to determine if a gun violence restraining order should be issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170) after notice and hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 898, Sec. 9.   (SB 1200)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Ex Parte Gun Violence Restraining Order [18150. - 18165.]

18150.

(a) (1) Any of the following individuals may file a petition requesting that the court issue an ex parte gun violence restraining order enjoining the subject of the petition from having in their custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm or ammunition:

(A) An immediate family member of the subject of the petition.

(B) An employer of the subject of the petition.

(C) A coworker of the subject of the petition, if they have had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year and have obtained the
 approval of the employer.

(D) An employee or teacher of a secondary or postsecondary school that the subject has attended in the last six months, if the employee or teacher has obtained the approval of a school administrator or a school administration staff member with a supervisorial role.

(E) A law enforcement officer.

(F) A roommate of the subject of the petition.

(G) An individual who has a dating relationship with the subject of the petition.

(H) An individual who has a child in common with the subject of the
 petition, if they have had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “dating relationship” has the same meaning as in paragraph (10) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “immediate family member” means any spouse, whether by marriage or not, domestic partner, parent, child, any person related by consanguinity or affinity
 within the second degree, or any person related by consanguinity or affinity within the fourth degree who has had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “roommate” means a person who regularly resides in the household, or who, within the prior six months, regularly resided in the household, and who has had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year. 

(5) This chapter does not require a person described in paragraph (1) to seek a gun violence restraining order.

(b) A court may issue an ex parte gun violence restraining order if the petition, supported by an affidavit made in writing and signed by the petitioner under oath, or an oral statement taken pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 18155, and any additional information provided to the court shows that there is a substantial likelihood that both of the following are true:

(1) The subject of the petition poses a significant danger, in the near future, of causing personal injury to the subject of the petition or another by having
 in their custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm as determined by considering the factors listed in Section 18155.

(2) An ex parte gun violence restraining order is necessary to prevent personal injury to the subject of the petition or another because less restrictive alternatives either have been tried and found to be ineffective, or are inadequate or inappropriate for the circumstances of the subject of the petition.

(c) An affidavit supporting a petition for the issuance of an ex parte gun violence restraining order shall set forth the facts tending to establish the grounds of the petition, or the reason for believing that they exist.

(d) An ex parte order under this chapter shall be
 issued or denied on the same day that the petition is submitted to the court, unless the petition is filed too late in the day to permit effective review, in which case the order shall be issued or denied on the next day of judicial business in sufficient time for the order to be filed that day with the clerk of the court.

(e) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.   (AB 2870)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18155.

(a) (1) The court, before issuing an ex parte gun violence restraining order, shall examine on oath, the petitioner and any witness the petitioner may produce.

(2) In lieu of examining the petitioner and any witness the petitioner may produce, the court may require the petitioner and any witness to submit a written affidavit signed under oath.

(b) (1) In determining whether grounds for a gun violence restraining order exist, the court shall consider all evidence of the following:

(A) A recent threat of violence or act of
 violence by the subject of the petition directed toward another individual, group, or location.

(B) A recent threat of violence or act of violence by the subject of the petition directed toward themselves.

(C) A violation of an emergency protective order issued pursuant to Section 646.91 or Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240) of Division 10 of the Family Code that is in effect at the time the court is considering the petition.

(D) A recent violation of an unexpired protective order issued pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code, Section 136.2, 527.6, 527.8, or 527.85 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or Section 213.5 or 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or comparable
 firearm-prohibiting protective orders, including extreme risk protection orders, issued by out-of-state courts.

(E) A conviction for any offense listed in Section 29805.

(F) A pattern of violent acts or violent threats within the past 12 months, including, but not limited to, threats of violence or acts of violence by the subject of the petition directed toward themselves or another individual, group, or location.

(2) In determining whether grounds for a gun violence restraining order exist, the court may consider any other evidence of an increased risk for violence, including, but not limited to, evidence of any of the following:

(A) The
 unlawful and reckless use, display, or brandishing of a firearm indicating an increased risk for violence or actual threat of violence by the subject of the petition, including, but not limited to, acts using electronic means of communication, including social media postings or messages, text messages, or email.

(B) The history of use, attempted use, or threatened use of physical force by the subject of the petition against another person.

(C) A prior arrest of the subject of the petition for a felony offense.

(D) A history of a violation by the subject of the petition of an emergency protective
 order issued pursuant to Section 646.91 or Part 3 (commencing with Section 6240) of Division 10 of the Family Code.

(E) A history of a violation by the subject of the petition of a protective order issued pursuant to Part 4 (commencing with Section 6300) of Division 10 of the Family Code, Section 136.2, 527.6, 527.8, or 527.85 of the Code of Civil Procedure, or Section 213.5 or 15657.03 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or comparable firearm-prohibiting protective orders, including extreme risk protection orders, issued by out-of-state courts.

(F) Documentary evidence, including, but not limited to, police reports and records of convictions, of either recent criminal offenses by the subject of the petition that involve controlled substances or alcohol or ongoing abuse
 of controlled substances or alcohol by the subject of the petition.

(G) Evidence of recent acquisition or attempted acquisition of firearms, ammunition, or other deadly weapons. While evidence of recent acquisitions is a factor the court may consider, the court may still issue a gun violence restraining order to temporarily prevent legal access to firearms even if the respondent does not own firearms, ammunition, or other deadly weapons at the time that the court is considering issuing a gun violence restraining order.

(H) Evidence of acquisition of body armor, as defined in Section 16288.

(I) Evidence of stalking, as defined in Section 646.9.

(J) Evidence of cruelty to animals, as defined in Section 597.

(K) Evidence of the respondent’s oral or written threats of violence toward any person or group because of their actual or perceived race or ethnicity, nationality, religion, disability, gender, or sexual orientation, including, but not limited to, threats using electronic means of communication, including social media postings or messages, text messages, or email. For the purposes of this subparagraph, “race or ethnicity,” “nationality,” “religion,” “disability,” “gender,” and “sexual orientation” are defined as in Section 422.56.

(L) Evidence of the respondent’s knowing
 and intentional defacement, damage, or destruction of the real or personal property of any other person for the purpose of intimidating or interfering with the free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to the other person by the Constitution or laws of this state or the Constitution or laws of the United States, in whole or in part because of a person’s actual or perceived race or ethnicity, nationality, religion, disability, gender, or sexual orientation, in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 422.6. “Race or ethnicity,” “nationality,” “religion,” “disability,” “gender,” and “sexual orientation” mean the same as defined in
 Section 422.56.

(M) Evidence of the respondent’s threats of violence to advance a political objective or threats of violence intended to interfere with any other person’s free exercise or enjoyment of any right or privilege secured to them by the Constitution or laws of this state or the United States, including, but not limited to, threats using electronic means of communication, including social media postings or messages, text messages, or email.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, “recent” means within the six months prior to the date the petition was filed.

(c) If the court determines that the
 grounds to issue an ex parte gun violence restraining order exist, it shall issue an ex parte gun violence restraining order that prohibits the subject of the petition from having in their custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive a firearm or ammunition, and expires no later than 21 days from the date of the order.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 539, Sec. 4.   (AB 2917)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

18160.

(a) An ex parte gun violence restraining order issued under this chapter shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement of the grounds supporting the issuance of the order.

(2) The date and time the order expires.

(3) The address of the superior court in which a responsive pleading should be filed.

(4) The date and time of the scheduled hearing.

(5) The following statement:
“To the restrained person: This order is valid until the expiration date and time noted above. You are required to surrender all firearms, ammunition, and magazines that you own or possess in accordance with Section 18120 of the Penal Code and you may not have in your custody or control, own, purchase, possess, or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive any firearm, ammunition, or magazine while this order is in effect. A hearing will be held on the date and at the time noted above to determine if a more permanent gun violence restraining order should be issued. Failure to appear at that hearing may result in a court making an order against you that is valid for a period of time between one to five years. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with the order. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may
 assist you in any matter connected with the order.”
(b) (1) An ex parte gun violence restraining order shall be personally served on the restrained person by a law enforcement officer, or by a person as provided in Section 414.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the restrained person can reasonably be located.

(2) When serving a gun violence restraining order, a law enforcement officer shall inform the restrained person of the hearing scheduled pursuant to Section 18165.

(3) When serving a gun violence restraining order, a law enforcement officer shall verbally ask the restrained person if the person has a firearm, ammunition, or magazine in the
 person’s possession or under the person’s custody or control.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 724, Sec. 6.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18165.

Within 21 days after the date on the order, before the court that issued the order or another court in the same jurisdiction, the court shall hold a hearing pursuant to Section 18175 to determine if a gun violence restraining order should be issued under Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170).

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 18122.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Gun Violence Restraining Order Issued After Notice and Hearing  [18170. - 18197.]

18170.

(a) (1) Any of the following individuals may request that a court, after notice and a hearing, issue a gun violence restraining order enjoining the subject of the petition from having in their custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm or ammunition for a period of time between one to five years:

(A) An immediate family member of the subject of the petition.

(B) An employer of the subject of the petition.

(C) A coworker of the subject of the petition, if they have had substantial and regular interactions with the subject
 for at least one year and have obtained the approval of the employer.

(D) An employee or teacher of a secondary or postsecondary school that the subject has attended in the last six months, if the employee or teacher has obtained the approval of a school administrator or a school administration staff member with a supervisorial role.

(E) A law enforcement officer.

(F) A roommate of the subject of the petition.

(G) An individual who has a dating relationship with the subject of the petition.

(H) An individual who has a child in common with the subject of the
 petition, if they have had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year.

(2) This chapter does not require a person described in paragraph (1) to seek a gun violence restraining order.

(b) For purposes of this subdivision, “dating relationship” has the same meaning as in paragraph (10) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.

(c) For
 purposes of this section, “immediate family member” means any spouse, whether by marriage or not, domestic partner, parent, child, any person related by consanguinity or affinity within the second degree, or any person related by consanguinity or affinity within the fourth degree who has had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year.

(d) For purposes of this subdivision, “roommate” means a person who regularly resides in the household, or who, within the prior six months, regularly resided in the household, and who has had
 substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year. 

(e) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 974, Sec. 2.   (AB 2870)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18175.

(a) In determining whether to issue a gun violence restraining order under this chapter, the court shall consider evidence of the facts identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 18155 and may consider any other evidence of an increased risk for violence, including, but not limited to, evidence of the facts identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18155.

(b) At the hearing, the petitioner has the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that both of the following are true:

(1) The subject of the petition, or a person subject to a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order or an
 ex parte gun violence restraining order, as applicable, poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to themselves or another by having in the subject’s or person’s custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm, ammunition, or magazine.

(2) A gun violence restraining order is necessary to prevent personal injury to the subject of the petition, or the person subject to an ex parte gun violence restraining order, as applicable, or another because less restrictive alternatives either have been tried and found to be ineffective, or are inadequate or inappropriate for the circumstances of the subject of the petition, or the person subject to an ex parte gun violence restraining order, as applicable.

(c) (1) If the court finds that there is clear and convincing evidence to issue a gun violence restraining order, the court shall
 issue a gun violence restraining order that prohibits the subject of the petition from having in the subject’s custody or control, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm, ammunition, or magazine.

(2) If the court finds that there is not clear and convincing evidence to support the issuance of a gun violence restraining order, the court shall dissolve a temporary emergency or ex parte gun violence restraining order then in effect.

(d) (1) The subject of the petition may file a form with the court relinquishing the subject’s firearm rights for the duration specified on the petition or, if not stated in the petition, for one year from the date of the proposed hearing, and stating that the subject is not contesting the petition.

(2) If the
 subject of the petition files a form pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall issue, without any hearing, the gun violence restraining order at least five court days before the scheduled hearing. If the subject files the form within five court days before the scheduled hearing, the court shall issue, without any hearing, the gun violence restraining order as soon as possible. The court shall provide notice of the order to all parties.

(3) If the subject of the petition files a form pursuant to paragraph (1) and has not already surrendered all firearms, ammunition, and magazines in the subject’s custody or control or those that the subject possesses or owns, the subject shall follow the procedures in Section 18120 but shall surrender the firearms, ammunition, and magazines within 48 hours of filing the form relinquishing firearm rights.

(e) (1) The court
 shall issue a gun violence restraining order under this chapter for a period of time of one to five years, subject to termination by further order of the court at a hearing held pursuant to Section 18185 and renewal by further order of the court pursuant to Section 18190.

(2) In determining the duration of the gun violence restraining order pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall consider the length of time that the circumstances set forth in subdivision (b) are likely to continue, and shall issue the order based on that determination.

(f) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 2.1) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 733, Sec. 2.2.   (AB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18180.

(a) A gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to this chapter shall include all of the following:

(1) A statement of the grounds supporting the issuance of the order.

(2) The date and time the order expires.

(3) The address of the superior court for the county in which the restrained party resides.

(4) The following statement:
“To the restrained person: This order will last until the date and
 time noted above. If you have not done so already, you must surrender all firearms, ammunition, and magazines that you own or possess in accordance with Section 18120 of the Penal Code. You may not have in your custody or control, own, purchase, possess, or receive, or attempt to purchase or receive a firearm, ammunition, or magazine, while this order is in effect. Pursuant to Section 18185, you have the right to request a hearing on an annual basis to terminate this order during its effective period. You may seek the advice of an attorney as to any matter connected with the order.”
(b) If the court issues a gun violence restraining order under this chapter, the court shall inform the restrained person that the person is entitled to a hearing on an annual basis to request a termination of the
 order, pursuant to Section 18185, and shall provide the restrained person with a form to request a hearing.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 11) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 724, Sec. 12.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18185.

(a) A person subject to a gun violence restraining order issued under this chapter may submit one written request per year during the effective period of the order for a hearing to terminate the order.

(b) If the court finds after the hearing that there is no longer clear and convincing evidence to believe that paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18175 are true, the court shall terminate the order.

(c) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 13) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 724, Sec. 14.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

18190.

(a) (1) Any of the following people may request a renewal of a gun violence restraining order at any time within the three months before the expiration of a gun violence restraining order:

(A) An immediate family member of the subject of the petition.

(B) An employer of the subject of the petition.

(C) A coworker of the subject of the petition, if they have had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year and have obtained the approval of the employer.

(D) An employee or teacher of a secondary or postsecondary school that the subject has attended in the last six months, if the employee or teacher has obtained the approval of a school administrator or a school administration staff member with a supervisorial role.

(E) A law enforcement officer.

(F) A roommate of the subject of the petition.

(G) An individual who has a dating relationship with the subject of the petition.

(H) An individual who has a child in common with the subject of the
 petition, if they have had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “dating relationship” has the same meaning as in paragraph (10) of subdivision (f) of Section 243.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, “immediate family member” means any spouse, whether by marriage or not, domestic partner, parent, child, any person related by consanguinity or affinity
 within the second degree, or any person related by consanguinity or affinity within the fourth degree who has had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year.

(4) For purposes of this subdivision, “roommate” means a person who regularly resides in the household, or who, within the prior six months, regularly resided in the household, and who has had substantial and regular interactions with the subject for at least one year. 

(5) This chapter does not require a person described in paragraph (1) to seek a gun violence restraining order.

(b) A court may, after notice and a hearing, renew a gun violence restraining order issued under this chapter if the petitioner proves, by clear and convincing evidence, that paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18175 continue to be true.

(c) In determining whether to renew a gun violence restraining order issued under this chapter, the court shall consider evidence of the facts identified in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 18155 and any other evidence of an increased risk for violence, including,
 but not limited to, evidence of any of the facts identified in paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18155.

(d) At the hearing, the petitioner shall have the burden of proving, by clear and convincing evidence, that paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 18175 are true.

(e) If the renewal petition is supported by clear and convincing evidence, the court shall renew the gun violence restraining order issued under this chapter.

(f) (1) The renewal of a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to this section shall have a duration of between one to five years, subject to termination by further order of the court at a hearing held pursuant to Section 18185 and further renewal by further
 order of the court pursuant to this section.

(2) In determining the duration of the gun violence restraining order pursuant to paragraph (1), the court shall consider the length of time that the circumstances set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 18175 are likely to continue, and shall issue the order based on that determination.

(g) A gun violence restraining order renewed pursuant to this section shall include the information identified in subdivision (a) of Section 18180.

(h) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 974, Sec. 3.   (AB 2870)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

18195.

Any hearing held pursuant to this chapter may be continued upon a showing of good cause. Any existing order issued pursuant to this division shall remain in full force and effect during the period of continuance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 18122.)
-------------------------------------------

18197.

(a) If a person subject to a gun violence restraining order issued or renewed pursuant to this chapter was not present in court at the time the order was issued or renewed, the gun violence restraining order shall be personally served on the restrained person by a law enforcement officer, or by a person as provided in Section 414.10 of the Code of Civil Procedure, if the restrained person can reasonably be located.

(b) This section shall become operative on September 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 17) and added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 724, Sec. 18.   (AB 12)   Effective January 1, 2020.   Section operative September 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Offenses [18200. - 18205.]

18200.

Every person who files a petition for an ex parte gun violence restraining order pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150) or a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and a hearing pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170), knowing the information in the petition to be false or with the intent to harass, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 872, Sec. 3.   (AB 1014)   Effective January 1, 2015.   Section operative January 1, 2016, pursuant to Section 18122.)
-------------------------------------------

18205.

(a) Every person who owns or possesses a firearm or ammunition with knowledge that they are prohibited from doing so by a temporary emergency gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 18125), an ex parte gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150), a gun violence restraining order issued after notice and a hearing issued pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170), or by a valid order issued by an out-of-state jurisdiction that is similar or equivalent to a gun violence restraining order described in this division, is
 guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be prohibited from having custody or control of, owning, purchasing, possessing, or receiving, or attempting to purchase or receive, a firearm or ammunition for a five-year period, to commence upon the expiration of the existing gun violence restraining order.

(b) For purposes of this section, a valid order issued by an out-of-state jurisdiction that is similar or equivalent to a gun violence restraining order described in this section must be issued upon a showing by clear and convincing evidence that the person poses a significant danger of causing personal injury to themselves or another because of owning or possessing a firearm or ammunition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 286, Sec. 2.   (AB 2617)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Gun Violence Restraining Order Pilot Project [18210. - 18225.]

18210.

The Legislature finds and declares that it is the intent of this chapter that, in the counties described in this chapter, the district attorney, any assistant district attorney, or any deputy district attorney may petition for a gun violence restraining order in accordance with the same laws and procedures governing the eligibility to petition for a gun violence restraining order pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170) of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1344)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 18225.)
-------------------------------------------

18215.

(a) The following counties may establish, until January 1, 2032, a pilot program to authorize a district attorney to file a petition for a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 18150) or Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 18170) of this division:

(1) County of Alameda.

(2) County of El Dorado.

(3) County of Santa Clara.

(4) County of Ventura.

(b) (1) As used in Section 18109, 18150, 18170, or 18190, “law enforcement officer” includes any district
 attorney, assistant district attorney, or deputy district attorney for a county identified in subdivision (a) that has established a pilot program pursuant to this section.

(2) As used in Section 18109, “law enforcement agency” includes the district attorney’s office for a county identified in subdivision (a) that has established a pilot program pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1344)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 18225.)
-------------------------------------------

18220.

(a) The district attorney of a county that establishes a pilot program pursuant to this chapter shall, commencing April 1, 2027, annually submit data regarding the pilot program to the California Firearm Violence Research Center at UC Davis. The data submitted shall include all of the following:

(1) The number of petitions filed and the outcome of the petitions, if any.

(2) Demographic data for the restrained individuals.

(3) The reasons that the petition was filed.

(4) Areas of success and
 areas for improvement in subsequent years.

(b) (1) The center may conduct an evaluation of a pilot program’s impact and effectiveness. If the center conducts an evaluation of a pilot project, the evaluation shall include, but not be limited to, the data described in subdivision (a).

(2) The center may, commencing on or before July 1, 2027, and annually thereafter, submit an evaluation described in paragraph (1) to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Public Safety.

(c) If the center conducts an evaluation of more than one pilot program pursuant to subdivision (b), the center may combine the evaluations into a comprehensive report and may submit the report, commencing on or before July 1, 2027, and
 annually thereafter, to the Assembly and Senate Committees on Public Safety.

(d) The district attorney of a county that establishes a pilot program pursuant to this chapter shall, commencing April 1, 2027, make the data described in subdivision (a) available upon request to the Department of Justice and the Judicial Council.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1344)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 18225.)
-------------------------------------------

18225.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed, unless a later enacted statute that is enacted before January 1, 2034, deletes or extends that date.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 573, Sec. 1.   (AB 1344)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 6, commencing with Section 18210.)
-------------------------------------------



  DIVISION 4. SEIZURE OF FIREARM OR OTHER DEADLY WEAPON AT SCENE OF DOMESTIC VIOLENCE [18250. - 18500.]



  CHAPTER 1. Seizure and Subsequent Procedures [18250. - 18275.]

18250.

(a) If any of the following persons is at the scene of a domestic violence incident involving a threat to human life or a physical assault, is serving a protective order as defined in Section 6218 of the Family Code, or is serving a gun violence restraining order issued pursuant to Division 3.2 (commencing with Section 18100), that person shall take temporary custody of any firearm or other deadly weapon in plain sight or discovered pursuant to a consensual or other lawful search as necessary for the protection of the peace officer or other persons present:

(1) A sheriff, undersheriff, deputy sheriff, marshal, deputy marshal, or police officer of a city, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section
 830.1.

(2) A peace officer of the Department of the California Highway Patrol, as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 830.2.

(3) A member of the University of California Police Department, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 830.2.

(4) An officer listed in Section 830.6, while acting in the course and scope of the officer’s employment as a peace officer.

(5) A member of a California State University Police Department, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 830.2.
